District of Columbia statutes.
1-1433

Technology Infrastructure Services Support Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Technology Infrastructure Services Support Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Chief Technology Officer in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

The Fund shall consist of the revenue from payments by independent District government agencies and federal agencies for services provided by the Office of the Chief Technology Officer in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(c)

The Fund shall be used solely to defray operational costs of programs of the Office of the Chief Technology Officer, other than the DC-Net program, that the Chief Technology Officer shall designate based on the use of such programs to provide services to independent agencies of the District and agencies of the federal government.

(d)

All funds deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

History

Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 1004, 54 DCR 7052
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 1042(b), 60 DCR 12472
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 9012, 61 DCR 9990

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 rewrote the section.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 rewrote (d).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1004 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1042(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1042(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 9012 and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 9012 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 9012 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Short Title

Section 1041 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle E of Title I of the act may be cited as the “Technology Services Support Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-155: Section 9029 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that the amendment by § 9012 of the act shall apply as of September 30, 2014.